Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.075

Temporary practice permits—Penalties.

(1) If an individual licensed in another state that has licensing standards substantially equivalent to Washington applies for a license, the disciplining authority shall issue a temporary practice permit authorizing the applicant to practice the profession pending completion of documentation that the applicant meets the requirements for a license and is also not subject to denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under this chapter. The temporary permit may reflect statutory limitations on the scope of practice. The permit shall be issued only upon the disciplining authority receiving verification from the states in which the applicant is licensed that the applicant is currently licensed and is not subject to charges or disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct or impairment. Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.422(3), the disciplining authority shall establish, by rule, the duration of the temporary practice permits.

(2) Failure to surrender the temporary practice permit is a misdemeanor under RCW 9A.20.010 and shall be unprofessional conduct under this chapter.

(3) The issuance of temporary permits is subject to the provisions of this chapter, including summary suspensions.

[ 2003 c 53 s 140; 1991 c 332 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application to scope of practice—Captions not law—1991 c 332: See notes following RCW 18.130.010.